Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3514
Right to use title and abbreviation.

A person holding an active license as a licensed certified surgical first assistant has the right to use the title licensed surgical first assistant and the abbreviation L.S.F.A.

Laws 2016, LB721, § 14.